Virginia statutes. Title 20. Domestic Relations.
Chapter 6. Divorce, Affirmation and Annulment.
4501
30600
1932
2867
3370
3765
4141
4501
30650
1932
2868
3371
3765
4141
4502
30700
1933
2869
3371
3765
4142
4502
30750
1934
2869
3371
3766
4143
4503
30800
1934
2870
3372
3766
4143
4504
30850
1935
2871
3372
3767
4144
4504
30900
1936
2871
3373
3767
4144
4505
30950
1936
2872
3373
3768
4145
4505
31000
1937
2873
3374
3768
4145
4506
31050
1938
2874
3374
3769
4146
4506
31100
1938
2874
3375
3769
4146
4507
31150
1939
2875
3375
3770
4147
4508
31200
1940
2876
3375
3770
4147
4508
31250
1940
2876
3376
3771
4148
4509
31300
1941
2877
3376
3771
4148
4509
31350
1942
2878
3377
3772
4149
4510
31400
1942
2878
3377
3772
4150
4511
31450
1943
2879
3378
3773
4150
4511
31500
1943
2880
3378
3773
4151
4512
31550
1944
2880
3378
3774
4151
4512
31600
1945
2881
3379
3774
4152
4513
31650
1945
2882
3379
3775
4152
4513
31700
1946
2882
3380
3775
4153
4514
31750
1947
2883
3380
3776
4153
4515
31800
1947
2884
3381
3776
4154
4515
31850
1948
2884
3381
3777
4154
4516
31900
1949
2885
3382
3777
4155
4516
31950
1949
2886
3382
3778
4155
4517
32000
1950
2886
3382
3778
4156
4518
32050
1951
2887
3383
3779
4156
4518
32100
1951
2888
3383
3779
4157
4519
32150
1952
2888
3384
3780
4158
4519
32200
1953
2889
3384
3780
4158
4520
32250
1953
2890
3385
3781
4159
4520
32300
1954
2890
3385
3781
4159
4521
32350
1955
2891
3385
3782
4160
4522
32400
1955
2892
3386
3782
4160
4522
32450
1956
2893
3386
3783
4161
4523
32500
1957
2893
3387
3783
4161
4523
32550
1957
2894
3387
3784
4162
4524
32600
1958
2895
3388
3784
4162
4525
32650
1959
2895
3388
3784
4163
4525
32700
1959
2896
3389
3785
4163
4526
32750
1960
2897
3389
3785
4164
4526
32800
1960
2897
3389
3786
4165
4527
32850
1961
2898
3390
3786
4165
4527
32900
1962
2899
3390
3787
4166
4528
32950
1962
2899
3391
3787
4166
4529
33000
1963
2900
3391
3788
4167
4529
33050
1964
2901
3392
3788
4167
4530
33100
1964
2901
3392
3789
4168
4530
33150
1965
2902
3392
3789
4168
4531
33200
1966
2903
3393
3790
4169
4532
33250
1966
2903
3393
3790
4169
4532
33300
1967
2904
3394
3791
4170
4533
33350
1968
2905
3394
3791
4170
4533
33400
1968
2905
3395
3792
4171
4534
33450
1969
2906
3395
3792
4172
4534
33500
1970
2907
3395
3793
4172
4535
33550
1970
2907
3396
3793
4173
4536
33600
1971
2908
3396
3794
4173
4536
33650
1972
2909
3397
3794
4174
4537
33700
1972
2909
3397
3795
4174
4537
33750
1973
2910
3398
3795
4175
4538
33800
1974
2911
3398
3796
4175
4539
33850
1974
2912
3399
3796
4176
4539
33900
1975
2912
3399
3797
4176
4540
33950
1976
2913
3399
3797
4177
4540
34000
1976
2914
3400
3798
4177
4541
34050
1977
2914
3400
3798
4178
4541
34100
1977
2915
3401
3799
4178
4542
34150
1978
2916
3401
3799
4179
4543
34200
1979
2916
3402
3800
4179
4543
34250
1979
2917
3402
3800
4180
4544
34300
1980
2917
3402
3800
4181
4544
34350
1981
2918
3403
3801
4181
4545
34400
1981
2919
3403
3801
4182
4545
34450
1982
2919
3404
3802
4182
4546
34500
1983
2920
3404
3802
4183
4546
34550
1983
2921
3405
3803
4183
4547
34600
1984
2921
3405
3803
4184
4548
34650
1984
2922
3405
3804
4184
4548
34700
1985
2923
3406
3804
4185
4549
34750
1986
2923
3406
3805
4185
4549
34800
1986
2924
3407
3805
4186
4550
34850
1987
2925
3407
3806
4186
4550
34900
1988
2925
3407
3806
4187
4551
34950
1988
2926
3408
3807
4187
4552
35000
1989
2927
3408
3807
4188
4552

For gross monthly incomes above $35,000, add the amount of child support for $35,000 to the following percentages of gross income above $35,000.

ONE
TWO
THREE
FOUR
FIVE
SIX
CHILD
CHILDREN
CHILDREN
CHILDREN
CHILDREN
CHILDREN
2.6%
3.4%
3.8%
4.2%
4.6%
5.0%

If a parent's gross income includes disability insurance benefits, it shall also include any amounts paid to or for the child who is the subject of the order and derived by the child from the parent's entitlement to disability insurance benefits. To the extent that such derivative benefits are included in a parent's gross income, that parent shall be entitled to a credit against his or her ongoing basic child support obligation for any such amounts, and, if the amount of the credit exceeds the parent's basic child support obligations, the credit may be used to reduce arrearages.

Gross income shall be subject to deduction of reasonable business expenses for persons with income from self-employment, a partnership, or a closely held business. "Gross income" shall not include:

For purposes of this subsection: (i) spousal support received shall be included in gross income and spousal support paid shall be deducted from gross income when paid pursuant to an order or written agreement and (ii) one-half of any self-employment tax paid shall be deducted from gross income.

Where there is an existing court or administrative order or written agreement relating to the child or children of a party to the proceeding, who are not the child or children who are the subject of the present proceeding, then there is a presumption that there shall be deducted from the gross income of the party subject to such order or written agreement, the amount that the party is actually paying for the support of a child or children pursuant to such order or agreement.

Where a party to the proceeding has a natural or adopted child or children in the party's household or primary physical custody, and the child or children are not the subject of the present proceeding, there is a presumption that there shall be deducted from the gross income of that party the amount as shown on the Schedule of Monthly Basic Child Support Obligations contained in subsection B that represents that party's support obligation based solely on that party's income as being the total income available for the natural or adopted child or children in the party's household or primary physical custody, who are not the subject of the present proceeding. Provided, however, that the existence of a party's financial responsibility for such a child or children shall not of itself constitute a material change in circumstances for modifying a previous order of child support in any modification proceeding. Any adjustment to gross income under this subsection shall not create or reduce a support obligation to an amount which seriously impairs the custodial parent's ability to maintain minimal adequate housing and provide other basic necessities for the child, as determined by the court.

In cases in which retroactive liability for support is being determined, the court or administrative agency may use the gross monthly income of the parties averaged over the period of retroactivity.

D1.
In any initial child support proceeding commenced within six months of the birth of a child, except for good cause shown or the agreement of the parties, in addition to any other child support obligations established pursuant to this section, the child support order shall provide that the parents pay in proportion to their gross incomes, as used for calculating the monthly support obligation, any reasonable and necessary unpaid expenses of the mother's pregnancy and the delivery of such child. Any amount paid under this subsection shall not be adjusted by, nor added to, the child support calculated in accordance with subsection G.

However, the monthly obligation of the noncustodial parent shall be reduced by the cost for health care coverage to the extent allowable by subsection E when paid directly by the noncustodial parent or that parent's spouse. Unreimbursed medical and dental expenses shall be calculated and allocated in accordance with subsection D.

For the purpose of this section and § 20-108.1, split custody shall be limited to those situations where each parent has physical custody of a child or children born of the parents, born of either parent and adopted by the other parent or adopted by both parents. For the purposes of calculating a child support obligation where split custody exists, a separate family unit exists for each parent, and child support for that family unit shall be calculated upon the number of children in that family unit who are born of the parents, born of either parent and adopted by the other parent or adopted by both parents. Where split custody exists, a parent is a custodial parent to the children in that parent's family unit and is a noncustodial parent to the children in the other parent's family unit.

4. Multiple shared custody support. In cases with different shared custody arrangements for two or more minor children of the parties, the procedures in subdivision G 3 shall apply, except that one shared guideline shall be used to determine the total amount of child support owed by one parent to the other by:

(a) Calculating each parent's custody share by adding the total number of days, as defined in subdivision G 3 (c), that each parent has with each child and dividing such total number of days by the number of children of the parties to determine the average number of shared custody days; and

(b) Using each parent's custody share as determined in subdivision G 4 (a) for each parent to calculate the child support owed, in accordance with the provisions of subdivision G 3.

5. Sole and shared custody support. In cases where one parent has sole custody of one or more minor children of the parties, and the parties share custody of one or more other minor children of the parties, the procedures in subdivisions G 1 and 3 shall apply, except that one sole custody support guideline calculation and one shared custody support guideline calculation shall be used to determine the total amount of child support owed by one parent to the other by:

(a) Calculating the sole custody support obligation by:

(b) Calculating the shared custody child support obligation by:

(c) Determining the total amount of child support owed by one parent to the other. Where one parent owes both the sole custody support obligation and the shared custody support obligation to the other parent, the total of both such obligations calculated pursuant to subdivisions G 5 (a) and G 5 (b) shall be added to determine the total amount of child support owed by one parent to the other. Where one parent owes one such obligation to the other parent, and such other parent owes the other such obligation to the other such parent, the parent owing the greater obligation amount to the other parent shall pay the difference between the obligations to such other parent.

6. Split and shared custody support. In cases where the parents have split custody of two or more children, and there is a shared custody arrangement with one or more other minor children of the parties, the procedures set forth in subdivisions G 2 and G 3 shall apply, except that one split custody child support guideline calculation and one shared custody child support guideline calculation shall be used to calculate the total amount of child support owed by one parent to the other by:

(a) Calculating the split custody child support obligation by:

(b) Calculating the shared custody child support obligation by:

(c) Determining the total amount of child support owed by one parent to the other. Where one parent owes both the split custody support obligation and the shared custody support obligation to the other parent, the total of both such obligations calculated pursuant to subdivisions G 6 (a) and G 6 (b) shall be added to determine the total amount of child support owed by one parent to the other. Where one parent owes one such obligation to the other parent, and such other parent owes the other such obligation to the other such parent, the parent owing the greater obligation amount to the other parent shall pay the difference between the obligations to such other parent.

Legislative members shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. Nonlegislative citizen members shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. All members may be reappointed. Appointments to fill vacancies, other than by expiration of a term, shall be made for the unexpired terms. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments.

Legislative members shall receive such compensation as provided in § 30-19.12, and nonlegislative citizen members shall receive such compensation for the performance of their duties as provided in § 2.2-2813. All members shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in §§ 2.2-2813 and 2.2-2825. Funding for the costs of compensation and expenses of the members shall be provided by the Department of Social Services.

The Department of Social Services shall provide staff support to the Panel. All agencies of the Commonwealth shall provide assistance to the Panel, upon request.

The chairman of the Panel shall submit to the Governor and the General Assembly a quadrennial executive summary of the interim activity and work of the Panel no later than the first day of 2006 regular session of the General Assembly and every four years thereafter. The executive summary shall be submitted as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports and shall be posted on the General Assembly's website.

(1988, c. 907; 1989, cc. 578, 579, 599; 1991, cc. 545, 588; 1992, cc. 79, 716, 860; 1995, cc. 1, 481; 1996, cc. 491, 947, 1029; 1998, c. 618; 1999, cc. 690, 808, 836; 2000, cc. 219, 305, 376, 384, 461; 2001, cc. 193, 809; 2002, cc. 650, 747; 2003, c. 885; 2004, cc. 907, 1008; 2005, c. 758; 2006, cc. 785, 798; 2008, c. 697; 2009, c. 713; 2010, c. 243; 2014, c. 667; 2015, c. 510; 2018, cc. 21, 22, 110, 191; 2020, c. 177.)

Cross references.

- As to standards and duties of neutrals conducting dispute resolution proceeding involving support of minor children, see

§

8.01-576.9.

As to disclosure of confidential information by mediator in disputes involving support of minor children, see

§

8.01-581.24.

As to formula for determination of pendente lite spousal support, see
§
16.1-278.17:1.

As to support of a committed juvenile, see
§
16.1-290.

As to child support for child placed in foster care by court, see
§
63.2-909.

As to authority of the Department of Social Services, in the absence of a court order, to direct the payment of child and child and spousal support, and under certain circumstances health care coverage, including requirements specified for employers pursuant to
§
20-79.3 A 5, see

§

63.2-1903.

As to computation of support for purposes of administrative support order, see
§
63.2-1918.
As to exchange of financial information by parties affected by a support order, see

§

63.2-1920. As to administrative review of support order, and presentation of proposed modifications to the court, see

§

63.2-1921.

Editor's note.

- Acts 2003, c. 885, cl. 7, provides: "That all current members of the collegial bodies whose terms have been modified by this act shall be eligible, if reappointed, to the full number of terms provided by this act regardless of prior service."

Acts 2005, c. 758, cl. 2, provides:
"That this act shall not be construed to affect existing appointments, made by the Senate Committee on Privileges and Elections, for which the terms have not expired. However, any new appointments made after July 1, 2005 shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this act."

Acts 2010, c. 243, cl. 3, provides: "That the Department of Social Services shall refund to any parent the full amount such parent paid that is solely attributable to, and required by, clause (iii) of subdivision G 1 of
§
20-108.2 of the Code of Virginia, as such clause existed immediately prior to the enactment of this act."

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of "Senate Committee on the Judiciary" for "Senate Committee for Courts of Justice" in subsection H. March 10, 2021.

The 1999 amendments.

- The 1999 amendment by c. 690 substituted "means" for "shall mean" in the fourth sentence of subsection B; substituted "means" for "shall mean" near the beginning of subsection C; and added the present third sentence in subsection F.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 808 and 836 are identical, and substituted "means" for "shall mean" in the fourth sentence of subsection B; substituted "means" for "shall mean" in the first sentence of subsection C; in subdivision G 1, substituted "Sole custody support. The sole custody" for "Except in cases involving split custody or shared custody, a," added "Split custody support" to the beginning of subdivision G 2, rewrote subdivision G 3, which formerly read: "In cases involving shared custody, the amount of child support to be paid is the difference between the amounts owed by each parent to the other parent, with the parent owing the larger amount paying the difference to the other parent. To compute the monthly amount to be paid by one parent to the other parent, the following calculations shall be made," rewrote subdivision G 3 (a) which formerly read: "The 'basic child support obligation' of each parent shall be the 'total shared support' multiplied by the other parent's 'custody share.' The 'total shared support' of both parties equals statutory guideline amount determined pursuant to subsection B for the combined income of the parties and the number of shared children multiplied by 1.25. A parent's 'custody share' equals the number of days that parent has physical custody of a shared child per year divided by the number of days in the year," rewrote subdivision G 3 (b) which formerly read: "To each parent's 'basic child support obligation' shall be added the other parent's costs of health care coverage, to the extent allowable by subsection E, and the other parent's work-related child care costs to the extent allowable by subsection F," rewrote the first two sentences in subdivision G 3 (c) which formerly read: "The obligation of each parent to the other shall be then computed by multiplying each parent's percentage of the parents' monthly combined gross income by the support obligation obtained in subdivision G 3 (b).

"The shared custody rules set forth herein apply when each parent has physical custody of a child or children born of the parties, born of either parent and adopted by the other parent, or adopted by both parents, for more than 110 days of the year," redesignated the former last sentence in subdivision G 3 (c) as the first sentence in subdivision G 3 (d), and in subdivision G 3 (d), inserted "Minimum standards" and added the last sentence, and added subdivision G 3 (e).

The 2000 amendments.

- The 2000 amendment by c. 219, in the first sentence of subsection H, substituted "October 31, 2001" for "July 1, 1990" and "three" for "four."

The 2000 amendment by c. 305, in subdivision G 3 (b), deleted "and this amount shall be added to the shared custody support amount as calculated herein" at the end of the fifth sentence, and added the last three sentences, in subdivision G 3 (d), in the second sentence, substituted "either party" for "the payee" near the beginning, and substituted "then the shared custody support calculated pursuant to this subsection shall not be the presumptively correct support and the court may consider whether the sole custody support or the shared custody support is more just and appropriate" for "there shall be a presumption that the sole custody guideline calculation shall apply" at the end, and added subdivision G 3 (f).

The 2000 amendment by c. 376, in subsection B, in the third sentence, inserted "unless one of the following exemptions applies" and substituted "sole custody child support obligation as computed pursuant to subdivision G 1 is less than $65 per month, there shall be a presumptive minimum child support obligation of $65 per month payable by the payor parent" for "combined monthly gross income is less than $599, the presumptive child support obligation shall be $65 per month," and inserted the present fourth sentence.

The 2000 amendment by c. 384 inserted "and dental care coverage" in subsection E.

The 2000 amendment by c. 461 substituted "an order" for "a pre-existing order" in two places in the third paragraph of subsection C.

The 2001 amendments.

- The 2001 amendment by c. 193, in subsection H, rewrote the first sentence, which formerly read: "The Secretary of Health and Human Resources shall ensure that the guideline set out in this section is reviewed by October 31, 2001, and every three years thereafter, by a panel which includes representatives of the courts, the executive branch, the General Assembly, the bar, custodial and noncustodial parents and child advocates."

The 2001 amendment by c. 809 rewrote the third sentence in the
third paragraph of subsection C, which formerly read: "For purposes of this subsection, spousal support included in gross income shall be limited to spousal support paid pursuant to an order or written agreement and spousal support shall be deducted from the gross income of the payor when paid pursuant to an order or written agreement between the parties to the present proceeding"; and inserted the present fourth and fifth paragraphs in subsection C.

The 2002 amendments.

- The 2002 amendment by c. 650, in the third paragraph of subsection C, inserted the clause (i) designation and added clause (ii).

The 2002 amendment by c. 747, effective October 1, 2002, in subsection A, substituted "Title 16.1 or 63.2" for "Title 16.1 or 63.1" in the first sentence; and substituted "Chapter 19 (
§
63.2-1900 et seq.) of Title 63.2 and subject to the provisions of

§

63.2-1918" for "Chapter 13 (

§

63.1-249 et seq.) of Title 63.1 and subject to the provisions of

§

63.1-264.2" in the last sentence; substituted "and social services programs as defined in

§

63.2-100" for "programs as defined in

§

63.1-87" in the third paragraph of subsection C; substituted "

§

643.2-1900" for "

§

63.1-250" in subsection E; deleted "of this section" following "subsection B" in clause G 1 (i); and deleted "of this subsection" following "subdivision 1" in the first paragraph of subdivision G 2.

The 2003 amendments.

- The 2003 amendment by c. 885, in paragraph G 3(c), substituted "24" for "twenty-four" twice; and rewrote subsection H.

The 2004 amendments.

- The 2004 amendments by cc. 907 and 1008 are nearly identical, and added subdivision C 4 and made related changes; rewrote subsection D; added the last sentence in subsection F; in the first paragraph of subdivision G 1, deleted clause (ii), which formerly read: "all extraordinary medical expenses" and redesignated former clause (iii) as clause (ii) and clause (iv) as clause (iii); added the last sentence in the second paragraph of subdivision G 1; added the last sentence in subdivision G 2; rewrote the last sentence in subdivision G 3 b; and in subsection H, substituted "four" for "three" in the first paragraph and in the last paragraph, "quadrennial" for "triennial," "four" for "three" and "2006" for "2005."

The 2005 amendments.

- The 2005 amendment by c. 758, in subsection H, substituted "comprised of four" for "that include four" in the first sentence, and "Rules" for "Privileges and Elections" in the second sentence.

The 2006 amendments.

- The 2006 amendments by cc. 785 and 798 are identical, and deleted "
§
20-107.2 and" preceding "20-108.1" in the second sentence of subsection A.

The 2008 amendments.

- The 2008 amendment by c. 697 inserted "for life" following "are imprisoned" in the fourth sentence of subsection B.

The 2009 amendments.

- The 2009 amendment by c. 713, in subsection E, inserted "or that parent's spouse" twice in the first sentence and added the second sentence; in subdivision G 1, in the first paragraph, inserted clause (iii), and made related changes, in the second paragraph, inserted "or that parent's spouse," in the second paragraph, inserted "or that parent's spouse"; and in subdivision G 3 (b), inserted "or that parent's spouse's."

The 2010 amendments.

- The 2010 amendment by c. 243, effective April 7, 2010, deleted the last sentence in subsection E, which read: "Where the court orders that a custodial parent enroll a child in health care coverage sponsored by the Department of Social Services, the Department shall deduct the cost of the coverage prior to disbursement of the child support payment in accordance with
§
63.2-1954.1"; and in subdivision G 1, deleted former clause (iii), which read: "cash medical support in cases where the child is a recipient of Medicaid or the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan as set forth in clause (ii) of the definition of cash medical support in

§

63.2-1900," and redesignated former clause (iv) as clause (iii).

The 2014 amendments.

- The 2014 amendment by c. 667, in subsection B, substituted "the statutory minimum" for "$65" twice in the third sentence, added the fourth sentence, and rewrote the table, and added the paragraph following the table; and in subsection D, deleted "that are in excess of $250 for any calendar year for each child who is the subject of the obligation" at the end of the first sentence.

The 2015 amendments.

- The 2015 amendment by c. 510 rewrote subsection E, which read "Any costs for health care coverage as defined in
§
63.2-1900 and dental care coverage, when actually being paid by a parent or that parent's spouse, to the extent such costs are directly allocable to the child or children, and which are the extra costs of covering the child or children beyond whatever coverage the parent or that parent's spouse providing the coverage would otherwise have, shall be added to the basic child support obligation."

The 2018 amendments.

- The 2018 amendments by cc. 21 and 191 are identical, and in the first sentence of subsection A, substituted "shared custody, or multiple custody arrangements pursuant to subdivisions G 4, 5, and 6," for "or shared custody"; in subsection B, in the second table, substituted "ONE CHILD" for "ONE CHILDREN"; and added subdivisions G 4 through G 6.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 22 and 110 are identical, and in subsection B, added the last sentence to the first paragraph and substituted "ONE CHILD" for "ONE CHILDREN" in the second table.

The 2020 amendments.

- The 2020 amendment by c. 177 added subsection D1.

Law review.

- For survey on domestic relations in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 561 (1989).

For 1995 survey of domestic relations, see 29 U. Rich. L. Rev. 993 (1995).

For an article, "Domestic Relations," see 31 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1069 (1997).

For an article relating to recent changes of formidable importance in major areas of domestic relations, both nationally and in Virginia, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1165 (1998).

For article, "Family Law," see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 651 (2001).

For article surveying developments in family law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 155 (2002).

For 2003/2004 survey of family and juvenile law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2004).

For 2006 survey article, "Family and Juvenile Law," see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

For annual survey article, "Family Law," see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 145 (2011).

For survey, "Grow Up Virginia: Time to Change Our Filial Responsibility Law," see 51 U. Rich. L. Rev. 265 (2016).

Research References.

- Friend's Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 34 Alternatives to Trial: Arbitration and Award and Dispute Resolution.
§
34.03 Dispute Resolution Proceedings. Friend.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender).
No. 2-1007 Scheduling Order for Divorce Trial.

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§§
53, 58; 9B M.J. Infants and Juveniles,

§

2; 14A M.J. Parent and Child,

§§

1, 17, 18.